Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB729.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1513 heading of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1513. Duplicate and substitute drivers' licenses [and], learners' permits and identification cards.* * *(c) Duplicate identification card fees.--A fee may not be charged for one duplicate identification card, including for a photograph required for a duplicate identification card, during the term of either an initial or renewal identification card to an individual exempt from fees under section 1901(b.1) (relating to exemption of persons, entities and vehicles from fees).123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0729PN0754 - 2 - 1